src/fst/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;


LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;

LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Two 1SG forms are attested after inner prefixes: (di)yis- and (d)ís.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;  

LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #; 


!
! ì-IPFV
!
LEXICON i-IPFV
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@                    i-IPFV-AFF ;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           is-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     is-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    is-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     is-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           ii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     ii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    ii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     ii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@às2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@às2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;

LEXICON i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works?
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;


LEXICON is-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@às2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON is-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@às2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON is-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
! TODO: 2S, 3S, 3P, and 4 forms need to be reviewed
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;


LEXICON ii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@às2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;

LEXICON ii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@às2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;  

LEXICON ii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; 


!
! ì-si-IPFV and ì-si-PFV
!
! As with si-IPFV and si-PFV, ì-si-IPFV and ì-si-PFV differ only in terms of
! their aspect, with the former being used with stative verbs and the latter
! with active/dynamic ones.  The forms of their inflectional markers are
! exactly the same.
!

LEXICON isi-IPFV
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.isi@                  isi-AFF ;

LEXICON isi-PFV
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@                   isi-AFF ;

LEXICON isi-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          isi-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    isi-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   isi-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    isi-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           isis-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     isis-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    isis-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     isis-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           isii-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     isii-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    isii-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     isii-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON isi-AFF-NoPrefix
! Two 3S, 3P, 4 forms are attested here (e.g., ìzìl, ììzil "3S got hot")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;

LEXICON isi-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Note 3SG/3PL/4SG ì- in this paradigm, compared to si-(I)PFV 3SG/4PL/4SG ìs-.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
! When an inner prefix is present, 1SG forms also appear as Cas (e.g.,
! dìsisho ~ dasho "I went, walked")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;

LEXICON isi-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
